New Mexico, session 2025S1, SB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 31-9-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1988, Chapter 107, Section 1 and Laws 1988, Chapter 108, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read: "31-9-1. DETERMINATION OF COMPETENCY--RAISING THE ISSUE.-- A. When a party or the court raises a question as to a defendant's competency to stand trial in a criminal case, the proceeding shall be suspended until the issue is determined. B. Unless the case is dismissed upon motion of a party or through diversion, if the question of a defendant's competency is raised in a court other than a district court or metropolitan court, the case shall be transferred to the district court; provided that if the question of a defendant's competency is raised in a metropolitan court and the court determines that the defendant is not competent to stand trial, the case shall be transferred to the district court." SECTION 2. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public peace, health and safety that this act take effect immediately. - 2 -